Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1006
Attachment; order; return day.

The return day of the order of attachment, when issued at the commencement of the action, shall be the same as that of the summons; when issued afterwards, it shall be twenty days after it issued.

R.S.1867, Code § 203, p. 426;

R.S.1913, § 7737;

C.S.1922, § 8681;

C.S.1929, § 20-1006;

R.S.1943, § 25-1006.

Action commenced when petition is filed and summons issued is bona fide. Coffman v. Brandhoeffer, 33 Neb. 279, 50 N.W. 6 (1891).